src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON a_n_pl_a
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_d
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_g
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;

!LEXICON a_n_pl_g_ra
! +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra # ;


!! ###  Definite declension
! ___________________

LEXICON Pos_Def
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
! Positiv, def
! Msc
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>i # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
! Fem
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
! Neu
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;

LEXICON Pos_Def2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 

!! Positiv, def, u-umlj
!! Msc
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>i # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:^UUML%>u # ;

!! Fem

 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:^UUML%>u # ;


!! Neu

 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:^UUML%>u # ;

LEXICON Pos_Def3
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
!! Positiv, def, ø-umlj
!! Msc

 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>i # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
!! Fem
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
!! Neu
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:^ØUML%>u # ;

LEXICON adj_def
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc: adj_def_msc ;
 +Fem: adj_def_fem ;
 +Neu: adj_def_neu ;


!! Gender tags

LEXICON adj_def_msc
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg: adj_def_msc_case ;
 +Pl: adj_def_pl       ;

LEXICON adj_def_fem
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg: adj_def_fem_case ;
 +Pl: adj_def_pl       ;

LEXICON adj_def_neu
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Sg: adj_def_neu_case ;
 +Pl: adj_def_pl       ;


!! Case tags

LEXICON adj_def_msc_case
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom+Def:%>i # ;
 +Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Cmp#:%>i mscnom_cmpnd ;
 +Cmp#:%>a mscobl_cmpnd ;
 
LEXICON adj_def_fem_case
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Gen+Def:%>u # ;
 +Cmp#:%>a femnom_cmpnd ;
 +Cmp#:%>u femobl_cmpnd ;

LEXICON adj_def_neu_case
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Cmp#:%>a neu_cmpnd ;


LEXICON adj_def_pl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Acc+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Dat+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
 +Gen+Def:^UUML%>u # ;
     +Adv:%>a       # ;
  +Cmp#:^UUML%>u pl_cmpnd ;



!! Compound flags

LEXICON mscnom_cmpnd ! fyrstiflokkur
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
@U.Case.MscNom@ Nouns ;

LEXICON mscobl_cmpnd ! fyrstaflokki
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
@U.Case.MscObl@ Nouns ;

LEXICON femnom_cmpnd ! lítlasystir
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
@U.Case.FemNom@ Nouns ;

LEXICON femobl_cmpnd ! lítlusystir
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
@U.Case.FemObl@ Nouns ;

LEXICON neu_cmpnd ! breiðaskarð
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
@U.Case.Neu@ Nouns ;

LEXICON pl_cmpnd ! fyrstuflokkarnir
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
@U.Case.Pl@ Nouns ;

! Debug
!LEXICON mscnom_cmpnd ! fyrstiflokkur
! Nouns ;
!LEXICON mscobl_cmpnd ! fyrstaflokki
! Nouns ;
!LEXICON femnom_cmpnd ! lítlasystir
! Nouns ;
!LEXICON femobl_cmpnd ! lítlusystir
! Nouns ;
!LEXICON neu_cmpnd ! breiðaskarð
! Nouns ;
!LEXICON pl_cmpnd ! fyrstuflokkarnir
! Nouns ;





!! # Comparative
! ===========

LEXICON Comp_Ari
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 CAri ;
 SAri ;
 
LEXICON CAri
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>aru # ;
! Fem
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>aru # ;
! Neu
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ara # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>aru # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>aru # ;

LEXICON SAri
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>astur # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>astan # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>astum # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>asts # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>astir # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>astar # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>astum # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>astra # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>asti # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>astu # ;
! Fem
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>astari # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>astar # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>astrar # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>astar # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>astar # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>astum # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>astra # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>astu # ;
! Neu
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>astum # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>asts # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ast # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>astum # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>astra # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>asta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>astu # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>astu # ;
