src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
eystari+A+CmpNP/None:eyst Comp_Ari ; ! riggar
høgri+A+CmpNP/None:høgr Pos_Def ; ! riggar
nærmari+A+CmpNP/None:nærm Comp_Ari ; ! riggar
norðari+A+CmpNP/None:norð Comp_Ari ; ! riggar
vestari+A+CmpNP/None:vest Comp_Ari ; ! riggar
vinstri+A+CmpNP/None:vinstr Pos_Def ; ! riggar
uttari+A+CmpNP/None:utt Comp_Ari ; ! riggar
innari+A+CmpNP/None:inn Comp_Ari ;
ovari+A+CmpNP/None:ov CAri ; ! riggar ikki
niðari+A+CmpNP/None:nið CAri ;  ! riggar ikki
